Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-233
Anabolic steroids; employees; prohibited acts; sanction.

(1) In addition to the penalties provided in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, any employee of a state agency, political subdivision, or institution who possesses, dispenses, delivers, administers, uses, or knowingly allows a subordinate employee or a student attending such employee's employing institution to possess, dispense, deliver, administer, or use an anabolic steroid unless such substance is needed for a valid medical purpose:

(a) For the first conviction, shall be dismissed from employment and shall not be an employee of the dismissing entity or any other state agency, political subdivision, or institution for a period of one year after his or her dismissal; and

(b) For a second or any subsequent conviction, shall be dismissed from employment and shall not thereafter be an employee of the dismissing entity or any other state agency, political subdivision, or institution.

(2) Any sanction imposed pursuant to this section shall be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act except for those employees governed by sections 79-824 to 79-842.

(3) The use of an anabolic steroid for the purpose of hormonal manipulation that is intended to increase muscle mass, strength, or weight without a medical necessity to do so or for the intended purpose of improving physical appearance or performance in any form of exercise, sport, or game shall not be a valid medical purpose or in the course of professional practice.

Laws 1990, LB 571, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 36;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1053.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.